test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k23_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: róður
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: róður
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: róðri
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: róðrar
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: róðrar
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: róðrar
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: róðrum
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: róðra
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: róðurin
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: róðurin
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: róðrinum
    róður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: róðrarins
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: róðrarnir
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: róðrarnar
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: róðrunum
    róður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: róðranna
